Hawaii statutes.
Winding Up
Partnership Business

§425-138 Events causing dissolution and
winding up of partnership business. A partnership is dissolved, and its
business shall be wound up, only upon the occurrence of any of the following
events:

(1) In a partnership at will, the partnership's
having notice from a partner, other than a partner who is dissociated under
section 425-130(2) to (10), of that partner's express will to withdraw as a
partner, or on a later date specified by the partner;

(2) In a partnership for a definite term or
particular undertaking:

(A) Within ninety days after a partner's
dissociation by death or otherwise under section 425-130(6) to (10) or wrongful
dissociation under section 425-131(b), the express will of at least half of the
remaining partners to wind up the partnership business, for which purpose a
partner's rightful dissociation pursuant to section 425-131(b)(2) constitutes
the expression of that partner's will to wind up the partnership business;

(B) The express will of all of the partners
to wind up the partnership business; or

(C) The expiration of the term or the
completion of the undertaking;

(3) An event agreed to in the partnership agreement
resulting in the winding up of the partnership business;

(4) An event that makes it unlawful for all or
substantially all of the business of the partnership to be continued, but a
cure of illegality within ninety days after notice to the partnership of the
event is effective retroactively to the date of the event for purposes of this section;

(5) On application by a partner, a judicial
determination that:

(A) The economic purpose of the partnership
is likely to be unreasonably frustrated;

(B) Another partner has engaged in conduct
relating to the partnership business which makes it not reasonably practicable
to carry on the business in partnership with that partner; or

(C) It is not otherwise reasonably
practicable to carry on the partnership business in conformity with the
partnership agreement; or

(6) On application by a transferee of a partner's
transferable interest, a judicial determination that it is equitable to wind up
the partnership business:

(A) After the expiration of the term or
completion of the undertaking, if the partnership was for a definite term or
particular undertaking at the time of the transfer or entry of the charging
order that gave rise to the transfer; or

(B) At any time, if the partnership was a
partnership at will at the time of the transfer or entry of the charging order
that gave rise to the transfer. [L 1999, c 284, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next